Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5613
Compliance with act; when.

No insurer or reinsurer may continue to utilize the services of a reinsurance intermediary on and after January 1, 1993, unless utilization is in compliance with the Reinsurance Intermediary Act.

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 67.